New York, session 2025-2026, S1750.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil service law is amended by adding a new section 2 137 to read as follows: 3 § 137. Comparable salary and other benefits. Notwithstanding any other 4 provision of law to the contrary, state employees designated managerial 5 or confidential under article fourteen of this chapter shall receive an 6 increase in salary at least equal to the percentage of the general sala- 7 ry increases provided to employees in a bargaining unit that receives 8 the highest percentage general salary increase. If a lump sum payment is 9 provided to employees in a bargaining unit in place of or in addition to 10 a general salary increase, the largest lump sum payment shall also be 11 paid to state employees designated managerial or confidential under 12 article fourteen of this chapter. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 14 the date upon which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04553-01-5